Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE A. HUNTING AND FISHING LICENSES

CHAPTER 49. FALCONRY PERMIT

Sec. 49.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Resident" means an individual who has resided continuously in this state for more than six months immediately before applying for a falconry permit.

(2) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident.

(3) "Falconry" means the practice of trapping, possessing, training, or flying a raptor for hunting purposes and includes the act of hunting by the use of a trained raptor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.002. PROHIBITED ACTS. (a) Except as provided in Subsection (b), no person may take, capture, or possess, or attempt to take or capture, any native raptors unless the person has obtained a permit issued by the department.

(b) A nonresident may temporarily possess in this state or transport through this state any raptor if the person is authorized by state and federal permits to possess the raptor in the person's state of residence or has been issued a permit under Chapter 43.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.003. RECIPROCITY. A person in possession of a raptor under a license issued by another state who intends to establish residency in this state must apply to the department for a falconry permit not later than the 10th day after the date the person first moves a raptor into this state. A signed and notarized affidavit stating the person's intent to establish residency in this state must accompany the application.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 116, ch. 57, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1335, ch. 277, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 2, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.010. HUNTING. (a) A resident possessing a falconry permit and a hunting license may hunt by means of falconry.

(b) A nonresident may hunt by means of falconry if the nonresident possesses on the nonresident's person:

(1) a federal falconry permit;

(2) a falconry permit issued in the person's state of residence; and

(3) a nonresident hunting license and any applicable stamps.

(c) A person may hunt a bird or animal by means of falconry only during an open season provided for that bird or animal.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 68, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.011. TRANSFER OR SALE OF RAPTORS. (a) Except as permitted in Subsections (b) and (c), no person may buy, sell, barter, or exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or exchange, a raptor in this state.

(b) The holder of a falconer's permit may transfer a raptor to another holder of a falconer's permit or receive a raptor from another holder of a falconer's permit.

(c) A holder of a falconer's permit who qualifies as prescribed by commission rule may purchase raptors from any legal source and may sell captive-bred raptors to any person permitted to purchase captive-bred raptors.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 117, ch. 57, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 69, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.012. PROPERTY OF STATE. All raptors captured, taken, or held in this state remain the property of the people of the state except as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 49.014. POWERS OF DEPARTMENT. The department may:

(1) prescribe rules for the taking, capture, possession, propagation, transportation, export, import, and sale of raptors, time and area from which raptors may be taken or captured, and species that may be taken or captured;

(2) provide standards for possessing and housing raptors held under a permit;

(3) prescribe annual reporting requirements and procedures;

(4) prescribe eligibility requirements and fees for and issue any falconry, raptor propagation, or nonresident trapping permit; and

(5) require and regulate the identification of raptors held by permit holders.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 117, ch. 57, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1977; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 49.015. RARE OR ENDANGERED SPECIES. The department shall insure that the taking and possessing for falconry purposes of raptors classified as rare or endangered by this state, the regulations of the department, or the United States Bureau of Sports, Fisheries, and Wildlife are restricted to competent and experienced individuals and to numbers consistent with good management practices and the current population status of the individual species or subspecies involved.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 117, ch. 57, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 49.017. PENALTIES. A person who violates a provision of this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.